Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.116

Admission of members.

(1) In connection with the admission of the initial member or members of a limited liability company, a person acquiring a limited liability company interest is admitted as a member of the limited liability company upon the later to occur of:

(a) The formation of the limited liability company; or

(b) The time provided in the limited liability company agreement or, if the limited liability company agreement does not so provide or does not exist, when the person's admission is reflected in the records of the limited liability company.

(2) After the admission of the initial member or members of a limited liability company, a person acquiring a limited liability company interest is admitted as a member of the limited liability company:

(a) In the case of a person acquiring a limited liability company interest directly from the limited liability company, at the time provided in the limited liability company agreement or, if the limited liability company agreement does not so provide or does not exist, upon the consent of all members and when the person's admission is reflected in the records of the limited liability company;

(b) In the case of a transferee of a limited liability company interest, upon compliance with any procedure for admission provided in the limited liability company agreement or, if the limited liability company agreement does not so provide or does not exist, upon the consent of all members and when the person's admission is reflected in the records of the limited liability company agreement;

(c) In the case of a person being admitted as a member of a surviving or resulting limited liability company pursuant to a merger or conversion approved in accordance with this chapter, as provided in the limited liability company agreement of the surviving or resulting limited liability company or in the agreement of merger or plan of merger or conversion, and in the event of any inconsistency, the terms of the agreement of merger or plan of merger or conversion control; and in the case of a person being admitted as a member of a limited liability company pursuant to a merger or conversion in which such limited liability company is not the surviving or resulting limited liability company in the merger or conversion, as provided in the limited liability company agreement of such limited liability company; or

(d) In the case of a transferee acquiring all of the transferor's limited liability company interest from a transferor that is the only member of the limited liability company, upon the effectiveness of the transfer.

(3) A person may be admitted as a member of a limited liability company without acquiring a transferable interest and without making or being obligated to make a contribution to the limited liability company.

[ 2022 c 42 s 303; 2015 c 188 s 25.]